Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 238A.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, the Public Employees
Retirement Board,  in consultation with the office of the State Treasurer, shall adopt rules
providing that if the Oregon Investment Council invests the assets of the  individual account
program in multiple risk categories depending  on the characteristics of an individual mem-
ber, a  member of the individual account program may elect to have the moneys in the
member’s individual accounts established under ORS 238A.350  deposited into an investment
option approved by the council.
(2) A member may  make an election under this section once per calendar year. The board
shall establish by rule the date by which a member must  make an election under this section
in order for the election to become effective on January 1 of the following calendar year.
(3) Subject  to such direction and oversight as may be provided by the Legislative As-
sembly, the board  shall take all steps necessary to develop and implement the information
technology systems needed to implement and carry out this section.
(4) The board may contract with a private  provider for purposes of implementing this
section. The board is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 279A or 279B  in awarding
a contract under the provisions of this subsection. The board shall establish  procedures for
inviting proposals and awarding contracts under this subsection.
(5) The board may adopt rules as necessary  to implement this section, but the council
and the  office of the State Treasurer retain authority over investment decisions required to
implement this section.
(6) The board may not adopt rules under subsection (1) of  this section that violate state
or federal laws or regulations.
SECTION 3. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall allow members of the indi-
vidual account program to make  an election under section 2 of this 2018 Act that becomes
effective on January 1, 2019.
SECTION 4. (1) The office of the State Treasurer shall review the legal and fiduciary
standards applicable to the Oregon Investment Council  and the office of the State Treasurer
with regard to implementation of section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(2) If the office of the State Treasurer determines under this section  that legal or
fiduciary standards prohibit implementation of section 2 of this 2018 Act,  the office of the
Enrolled House Bill 4159 (HB 4159-A) Page 1
State Treasurer shall notify the Public Employees Retirement Board no  later than December
31, 2018, and, notwithstanding section 2 of this 2018 Act, the board may not adopt rules to
implement section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4159 (HB 4159-A) Page 2